Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5905.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10. (1) Except as otherwise provided in the code and this act, before construction of a building or structure, the owner, or the owner's builder, contractor, architect, engineer, or agent, shall submit an application in writing to the appropriate enforcing agency for a building or construction permit. The application shall must be on a form prescribed by the commission and shall be accompanied by payment of the fee established by the enforcing agency. The application shall must contain a detailed statement in writing, verified by affidavit of the individual making it, of the specifications for the building or structure, and full and complete copies of the plans drawn to scale of the proposed work. A site plan showing the dimensions , and the location of the proposed building or structure and other buildings or structures on the same premises , shall must be submitted with the application. The application shall must state in full the full name and residence, by street and number, of the owner in fee of the land on which the building or structure will be constructed, and the purposes for which it the building or structure will be used. (2) If construction is proposed to be undertaken by a person other than the owner of the land in fee, the statement shall under subsection (1) must contain the full name and residence, by street and number, of the owner and also of the person proposing the construction. The affidavit shall must state that the specifications and plans are true and complete and contain a correct description of the building or structure, lot or parcel, and proposed work. The statements and affidavits may be made by an owner, or the owner's attorney, agent, engineer, architect, or builder, or contractor, or by the person who proposes to make the construction or alteration, or by that person's agent, engineer, architect, or builder. A person shall must not be recognized as the agent, attorney, engineer, architect, or builder, or contractor of another person unless the person seeking recognition files with the enforcing agency a written instrument , which shall be that is an architectural, engineering, or construction contract, power of attorney, or letter of authorization signed by that other person designating that designates the person seeking recognition as the agent, attorney, architect, engineer, or builder, and, in case of or contractor. If the person seeking recognition is a residential builder or maintenance and alteration contractor, architect, or engineer, setting forth the written instrument must include the license number of the person seeking recognition and the expiration date of the license. (3) A person licensed or required to be licensed as a residential builder or residential maintenance and alteration contractor under article 24 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.101 to 339.2919, MCL 339.2401 to 339.2412, a plumbing contractor or master or journeyman plumber under article 11 of the skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.6101 to 339.6133, an electrical contractor, master electrician, or electrical journeyman under article 7 of the skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.5701 to 339.5739, or pursuant to in accordance with a local ordinance, or a mechanical contractor under article 8 of the skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.5801 to 339.5819, who applies for a building permit to perform work on a residential building or a residential structure shall, in addition to any other information required pursuant to under this act, provide on the building permit application all of the following information: (a) The occupational license number of the applicant and the expiration date of the occupational license. (b) One of the following: (i) The name of each carrier providing worker's disability compensation insurance to the applicant if the applicant is required to be insured pursuant to under the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.101 to 418.941. (ii) The reasons for exemption from the requirement to be insured if the applicant is not required to be insured under the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.101 to 418.941. (c) One of the following: (i) The employer identification number, if the applicant is required to have an employer identification number pursuant to under section 6109 of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 6109. (ii) The reasons for exemption from the requirement to have an employer identification number pursuant to under section 6109 of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 6109, if the applicant is not required to have an employer identification number pursuant to under that section. (d) One of the following: (i) The Michigan employment security commission unemployment insurance agency employer number, if the applicant is required to make contributions pursuant to under the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.1 to 421.75. (ii) If the applicant is not required to make contributions, the reasons for exemptions from the requirement to make contributions under the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.1 to 421.75. (4) The building or construction permit application form shall must contain the following statement in 8-point boldfaced type immediately above the location for the applicant's signature: "Section 23a of the state construction code act of 1972, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1523a, prohibits a person from conspiring to circumvent the licensing requirements of this state relating to persons who are to perform work on a residential building or a residential structure. Violators of section 23a are subjected to civil fines." (5) The application for a building permit shall must be filed with the enforcing agency and the application and any other writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the enforcing agency in the performance of an official function shall must be made available to the public in compliance with the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. An application shall must not be removed from the custody of the enforcing agency after a building or construction permit has been issued. (6) This section shall be construed to allow the imposition of requirements in the code, or in other laws or ordinances, for additional permits for particular kinds of work, including plumbing and electrical, or in other specified situations. The requirements of the code may provide for issuance of a construction permits permit for certain of the systems of a structure and allow construction to commence on those systems approved under that permit even though the design and approval of all the systems of the structure have not been completed and subsequent construction permits have not been issued. (7) A building or construction permit is not required for ordinary repairs of a building or structure. (8) A building or construction permit is not required for a building incidental to the use for agricultural purposes of the land on which the building is located if the building is not used in the business of retail trade. (9) A qualifying roadside stand is exempt from the plumbing fixture requirements of this act and the code and is not required to have electric power. However, a qualifying roadside stand that has electric power must comply with the electrical code. This subsection does not exempt a qualifying roadside stand from a requirement to obtain a building or construction permit. As used in this subsection, "qualifying roadside stand" means a roadside stand that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is used only for seasonal retail trade in agricultural products. (b) At least 50% of the agricultural products offered for sale at the roadside stand are produced on a farm that is owned or controlled by the person who owns the roadside stand. (c) Is not larger than 400 square feet. (d) Is securely anchored to the ground. (10) A tent that meets the requirements of subsection (9)(a), (b), and (c) is exempt from this act and the code. (11) If a person submits an application to an enforcing agency for a construction permit to install replacement equipment, the enforcing agency shall not require the person to obtain 1 or more additional construction permits for that installation if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The person is only connecting or adapting an existing electrical circuit, gas line, vent, or water piping to the replacement equipment. (b) The replacement equipment is similar to the equipment being replaced and has an output capacity and electrical amperage requirements that are equal to or less than the equipment being replaced. If the department or an enforcing agency requires proof that the replacement equipment meets the requirements of this subdivision, either of the following is considered to be sufficient evidence to satisfy that requirement: (i) An affidavit from the contractor who installs the replacement equipment that verifies the replacement equipment meets the requirements of this subdivision. (ii) Images taken by the contractor who installs the replacement equipment that show the equipment being replaced before the replacement occurs. (c) The existing electrical circuit, gas line, vent, or water piping that the contractor is connecting or adapting to the replacement equipment meets the requirements of the code. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Construction permit" means a permit described in subsection (6). (b) "Contractor" means a person described in subsection (3). (c) "Replacement equipment" means equipment that meets the requirements of subsection (11)(b) that a person installs to replace other equipment.